New Jersey, session 222, S306.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   N.J.S.3B:5-12 is amended to read as follows: 3B:5-12.    a. An individual is not disqualified to take as an heir because he or an individual through whom he claims is or has been [an alien] a noncitizen. b.    An individual who is related to the decedent through two lines of relationship is entitled to only a single share based on the relationship that would entitle the individual to the larger share. (cf: P.L.2004, c.132, s.54) 2.   N.J.S.3B:28-1 is amended to read as follows: 3B:28-1.  Estates of dower and curtesy prior to May 28, 1980. The widow or widower, whether [alien] noncitizen or not, of an individual dying intestate or otherwise, shall be endowed for the term of his life of one half of all real property of which the decedent, or another to the decedent's use, was seized of an estate of inheritance at any time during marriage prior to May 28, 1980, unless the widow or widower shall have relinquished her right of dower or his right of curtesy in the manner provided by P.L.1953, c.352 (C.37:2-18.1) or such right of dower or such right of curtesy otherwise shall have been extinguished by law. (cf: P.L.2005, c.160, s.19) 3.   Section 13 of P.L.1970, c.13 (C.5:9-13) is amended to read as follows: 13.  a.  The right of any person to a prize drawn shall not be assignable, except as permitted by this section. b.    The payment of any prize drawn may be paid to the estate of a deceased prize winner upon receipt by the State Lottery of a certified copy of an order appointing an executor or an administrator. c.     Any person may be assigned and paid the prize to which the winner is entitled pursuant to a judicial order of the New Jersey Superior Court or a federal court having jurisdiction over property located in this State provided that the order pertains to claims of ownership in the prize drawn, division of marital property in divorce actions, bankruptcy, child support, appointment of a guardian or conservator, or distribution of an estate. d.    Any person may be assigned and paid a prize to which the winner is entitled pursuant to a judicial order of the New Jersey Superior Court or a federal court having jurisdiction over property located in this State provided that the order contains at least the following findings: (1)   the full legal name, address, social security number or taxpayer identification number and, if applicable, resident [alien] noncitizen number of the winner; (2)   the full legal name, address, social security number or taxpayer identification number and, if applicable, resident [alien] noncitizen number of the assignee; (3)   the date on which the winner won the prize; (4)   the date on which the winner claimed the prize; (5)   the gross amount of the prize drawn before application of withholding taxes; (6)   the gross amount of payments to be made to the winner by the State Lottery before application of withholding taxes; (7)   the dates of the payments to be assigned and the amount of the specific payments to be assigned on each date;       (8) the identity of the winner's spouse, if any, and the interest of the spouse in the prize; (9)   the identity of any other co-owner, claimant or lienholder and the amount of the interests, liens, security interests, prior assignments or offsets asserted by such party; (10) that the interest rate or discount rate, as applicable, and all fees and costs and other material terms relating to the assignment are expressly and clearly included in all material documents and in all documents that include any obligations of the prize winner; (11) that the interest rate or discount rate, as applicable, associated with the assignment does not indicate overreaching or exploitation, does not exceed current usury rates, and does not violate any laws of usury of this State; (12) that the winner has reviewed and understands the terms of the assignment; (13) that the winner understands that the winner will not receive the prize payments, or portions thereof, for the years assigned; (14) that the winner has agreed to the assignment of the winner's own free will without undue influence or duress; (15) that the winner has retained, and consulted with, independent legal counsel who has advised the winner of the winner's legal rights and obligations; (16) that the winner has retained, and consulted with, an independent tax advisor concerning the tax consequences of the assignment; (17) that the winner does not seek assignment for purposes of evading creditors, judgments or obligations for child support; and (18) that the winner has certified that the winner does not have a child support obligation, or if the winner has a child support obligation, that no arrearage is due and that the winner is not obligated to repay any public assistance benefits. e.     Before a winner is legally bound, by agreement, contract or otherwise, and prior to the issuance of an order pursuant to subsection d. of this section, the assignee shall provide the winner with all material documents which shall be binding on the assignor, including documents evidencing obligations of the winner, and a written notice recommending that the winner obtain independent counsel before signing any document which shall be binding on the assignor.  All documents shall include a notice of the assignor's right to cancel the agreement which shall be located in immediate proximity to all spaces reserved for the signature of the winner in bold-faced type of at least 10 points and which shall provide as follows: "You have the right to cancel this assignment without any cost to you until midnight three business days after the day on which you have signed an agreement to assign all or a portion of your prize. Cancellation occurs when you give notice by regular first class mail, postage prepaid, to the assignee at the address listed at the top of the first page of this document that you wish to cancel the assignment.  Notice is deemed given when deposited in a mailbox." f.     If the State Lottery determines that a judicial order granting an assignment, issued pursuant to subsection d. of this section, is complete and correct in all respects, the State Lottery shall, not later than 10 days after receiving a true and correct copy of the filed judicial order, send the winner and the assignee written confirmation of receipt of the court-ordered assignment and of the State Lottery's intent to rely thereon in making future payments to the assignee named in the order.  The State Lottery shall, thereafter, make all payments in accordance with the judicial order.  No change in the terms of any assignment shall be effective unless made pursuant to a subsequent judicial order. g.    The State Lottery may impose a reasonable fee on an assignor to defray any direct or indirect administrative expenses associated with an assignment. h.    A winner shall not be permitted to assign the last two annual prize payments. i.     The State Lottery and the State are not parties to assignment proceedings, except that, the State may intervene as necessary to protect the State's interest in monies owed to the State. j.     The State Lottery and the State shall comply with, and rely upon, a judicial order in distributing payments subject to that order. k.    A winner may pledge or grant a security interest in all or part of a prize as collateral for repayment of a loan pursuant to a judicial order containing the findings required by subsection d. of this section which the court deems relevant to the pledge or grant. l.     Except where inconsistent with the provisions of this section, the New Jersey consumer fraud act, P.L.1960, c.39 (C.56:8-1 et seq.), shall apply to all transactions under this section. m.   The court shall cease to approve assignments pursuant to subsection d. of this section if: (1)   the United States Internal Revenue Service issues a technical rule letter, revenue ruling, or other public ruling in which it is determined that because of the right of assignment provided by subsection d. of this section, prizewinners who do not exercise the right to assign prize payments would be subject to an immediate income tax liability for the value of the entire prize rather than annual income tax liability for each installment when received; or (2)   a court of competent jurisdiction issues a published decision holding that because of the right of assignment provided by subsection d. of this section, prizewinners who do not exercise the right to assign prize payments would be subject to an immediate income tax liability for the value of the entire prize rather than annual income tax liability for each installment when received. n.    Upon receipt, the director shall immediately file a copy of a letter or ruling of the United States Internal Revenue Service or a published decision of a court of competent jurisdiction, described in subsection m. of this section, with the Secretary of State.  No assignment shall be approved pursuant to subsection d. of this section after the date of such filing. o.    Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, any lottery prize assignment or loan transaction which has been approved by a New Jersey Superior Court pursuant to section 13 of P.L.1970, c.13 (C.5:9-13) on or before May 15, 1998, regardless of whether such an order has been or is the subject of an appeal, shall, upon joint written agreement of the parties, be deemed a binding assignment or transaction and shall be honored by the Division of the State Lottery. p.    No change in the terms of any assignment shall be effective unless made pursuant to a subsequent court order under this section. q.    A voluntary assignment shall not include or cover payments, or portions of payments, that are subject to the offset pursuant to P.L.1991, c.384 (C.5:9-13.1 et seq.), P.L.1997, c.306 (C.5:9-13.10 et seq.), or any other law unless appropriate provisions are made to satisfy the obligations giving rise to the offset. r.     No lottery assignee shall directly or indirectly recommend or facilitate the hiring of any lawyer or accountant to assist the assignor in determining the appropriateness of the proposed assignment.  Further, the assignee shall not offer prior to the closing tax or investment advice. s.     The director, commissioners and employees of the Division of the State Lottery shall be discharged of any and all liability upon payment of a prize drawn pursuant to this section. (cf: P.L.1998, c.103, s.1) 4.   Section 4 of P.L.2005, c.46 (C.5:12-100.1) is amended to read as follows: 4.    a.  The right of any annuity jackpot winner to receive annuity jackpot payments from a slot system operator shall not be assignable, except as permitted by this section. The provisions of this section shall prevail over the provisions of the "Uniform Commercial Code Secured Transactions," N.J.S.12A:9-101 et seq., including N.J.S.12A:9-406, or any other law to the contrary. b.    Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, annuity jackpot payments may be paid to the estate of a deceased jackpot winner, in the same manner as they were paid to the winner, upon receipt by the slot system operator of a certified copy of an order appointing an executor or an administrator. c.     A person may be assigned and paid the annuity jackpot payments to which an annuity jackpot winner is entitled pursuant to a judicial order of the New Jersey Superior Court or any other court having jurisdiction over property located in this State provided that the order pertains to claims of ownership in the annuity jackpot payments, division of marital property in divorce actions, bankruptcy, child support, appointment of a guardian or conservator, or distribution of an estate. d.    A person may be assigned and paid the annuity jackpot payments to which an annuity jackpot winner is entitled pursuant to a judicial order of the New Jersey Superior Court or any other court having jurisdiction over property located in this State. The annuity jackpot winner and the proposed assignee shall prepare a proposed form of order and submit such proposed order to the court for its consideration. The proposed form of order shall contain the following information: (1)   the full legal name, address, social security number or taxpayer identification number and, if applicable, resident [alien] noncitizen number of the winner; (2)   the full legal name, address, social security number or taxpayer identification number and, if applicable, resident [alien] noncitizen number of the assignee; (3)   the date on which and the casino where the annuity jackpot was won; (4)   the slot machine game on which the annuity jackpot was won; (5)   the slot system operator primarily responsible for making the annuity jackpot payments; (6)   the gross amount of the annuity jackpot won before application of withholding taxes; (7)   the gross amount of each payment to be made to the winner by the slot system operator before application of withholding taxes; (8)   the dates of the payments to be assigned and the amount of the specific payments to be assigned on each date; (9)   the identity of the winner's spouse, domestic partner or partner in a civil union, if any, and the interest of that person, if any, in the annuity jackpot payments; (10) the identity of any other co-owner, claimant or lienholder and the amount of the interests, liens, security interests, prior assignments or offsets asserted by each such party; (11) that the interest rate or discount rate, as applicable, and all fees and costs and other material terms relating to the assignment are expressly and clearly included in all material documents and in all documents that include any obligations of the annuity jackpot winner; (12) that the interest rate or discount rate, as applicable, and any other fees or charges associated with the assignment do not indicate overreaching or exploitation, do not exceed current usury rates, and does not violate any laws of usury of this State; (13) that the winner has reviewed and understands the terms of the assignment; (14) that the winner understands that the winner will not receive the annuity jackpot payments, or portions thereof, for the years assigned; (15) that the winner has agreed to the assignment of the winner's own free will without undue influence or duress; (16) that the winner has retained and consulted with independent legal counsel who has advised the winner of the winner's legal rights and obligations; (17) that the winner has retained and consulted with an independent tax advisor concerning the tax consequences of the assignment; (18) that the winner has disclosed all existing debts, liens and child support obligations and does not seek assignment for purposes of evading creditors, judgments or obligations for child support; and (19) that the winner has certified that: the winner is not obligated to repay any public assistance benefits; and the winner does not have a child support obligation, or if the winner does have a child support obligation, that no arrearage is due. The annuity jackpot winner and the proposed assignee shall provide a copy of the proposed form of order to the slot system operator at least 10 days before the court is scheduled to act on the proposed order to allow the slot system operator the opportunity to ensure that the proposed order is complete and correct in all respects prior to the court's approval. e.     Before a winner is legally bound, by agreement, contract or otherwise, and prior to the issuance of an order pursuant to subsection d. of this section, the assignee shall provide the winner with all material documents which shall be binding on the assignor, including documents evidencing obligations of the winner, and a written notice recommending that the winner obtain independent counsel before signing any document which shall be binding on the assignor. All documents shall include a notice of the assignor's right to cancel the agreement which shall be located in immediate proximity to all spaces reserved for the signature of the winner in bold-faced type of at least 10 points and which shall provide as follows: "You have the right to cancel this assignment without any cost to you until midnight three business days after the day on which you have signed an agreement to assign all or a portion of your annuity jackpot. Cancellation occurs when you give notice by regular first class mail, postage prepaid, to the assignee at the address listed at the top of the first page of this document that you wish to cancel the assignment. Notice is deemed given when deposited in a mailbox." f.     The slot system operator shall, not later than 10 days after receiving a true and correct copy of the filed judicial order, send the winner and the assignee written confirmation of receipt of the court-ordered assignment and of the slot system operator's intent to rely thereon in making future payments to the assignee named in the order. The slot system operator shall, thereafter, make all payments in accordance with the judicial order. No change in the terms of any assignment shall be effective unless made pursuant to a subsequent judicial order pursuant to this section. g.    The slot system operator may impose a reasonable fee on an assignor to defray any direct or indirect administrative expenses associated with an assignment. h.    The division, the commission and the State are not parties to assignment proceedings, except that the State may intervene as necessary to protect the State's interest in monies owed to the State. i.     The slot system operator and the State shall comply with, and rely upon, a judicial order in distributing payments subject to that order. j.     A winner may pledge or grant a security interest in all or part of an annuity jackpot as collateral for repayment of a loan pursuant to a judicial order containing the information required by subsection d. of this section which the court deems relevant to the pledge or grant. k.    Except where inconsistent with the provisions of this section, the New Jersey consumer fraud act, P.L.1960, c.39 (C.56:8-1 et seq.), shall apply to all transactions under this section. l.     The provisions of subsections d., e. and j. of this section shall be invalid if: (1) the United States Internal Revenue Service issues a technical rule letter, revenue ruling, or other public ruling in which it is determined that because of the right of assignment provided by subsection d. of this section, annuity jackpot winners who do not exercise the right to assign annuity jackpot payments would be subject to an immediate income tax liability for the value of the entire annuity jackpot rather than annual income tax liability for each installment when received; or (2)   a court of competent jurisdiction issues a published decision holding that because of the right of assignment provided by subsection d. of this section, annuity jackpot winners who do not exercise the right to assign annuity jackpot payments would be subject to an immediate income tax liability for the value of the entire annuity jackpot rather than annual income tax liability for each installment when received. m.   Upon receipt, the division shall immediately file a copy of a letter or ruling of the United States Internal Revenue Service or a published decision of a court of competent jurisdiction, described in subsection l. of this section, with the Secretary of State. No assignment shall be approved pursuant to subsection d. of this section after the date of such filing. n.    A voluntary assignment shall not include or cover payments, or portions of payments, that are subject to the offset pursuant to section 5 of this amendatory and supplementary act, P.L.2005, c.46 (C.5:12-100.2), or any other law, unless appropriate provisions are made to satisfy the obligations giving rise to the offset. o.    No assignee shall directly or indirectly recommend or facilitate the hiring of any lawyer or accountant to assist the assignor in determining the appropriateness of the proposed assignment. Further, the assignee shall not offer, prior to the closing, tax or investment advice. (cf: P.L.2011, c.19, s.66) 5.   Section 1 of P.L.1987, c.53 (C.18A:3-19.1) is amended to read as follows: 1.    As used in this act: "Foreign government" means any government other than the government of the United States or of its states, territories or possessions or any political subdivision thereof. "Foreign legal entity" means a. any legal entity created under the laws of a foreign government or b. any legal entity created under the laws of the United States or any of its political subdivisions if a majority of the ownership of that legal entity is directly or indirectly held legally or beneficially by one or more foreign governments or one or more foreign persons or one or more legal entities created under the laws of a foreign government and includes an agent acting for the legal entity. "Foreign person" means any individual who is not a citizen of or resident [alien] noncitizen of the United States or of its territories or possessions and includes an agent acting for the foreign person. "Gift" means any endowment, gift, grant, contract, award, present or property of any kind. (cf: P.L.1987, c.53, s.1) 6.   Section 1 of P.L.2013, c.170 (C.18A:62-4.4) is amended to read as follows: 1.    a.  Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, a student, other than a nonimmigrant [alien] noncitizen, within the meaning of a nonimmigrant alien, as defined under section 101 (a)(15) of the "Immigration and Nationality Act" (8 U.S.C. s.1101(a)(15)), shall be exempt from paying out-of-State tuition at a public institution of higher education if the student: (1)   attended high school in this State for three or more years; (2)   graduated from a high school in this State or received the equivalent of a high school diploma in this State; (3)   registers as an entering student or is currently enrolled in a public institution of higher education not earlier than the fall semester of the 2013-2014 academic year; and (4)   in the case of a person without lawful immigration status, files an affidavit with the institution of higher education stating that the student has filed an application to legalize his immigration status or will file an application as soon as he is eligible to do so. b.    Student information obtained in the implementation of this section shall be confidential. c.     The Secretary of Higher Education shall adopt rules and regulations pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), necessary to effectuate the provisions of this section. (cf: P.L.2013, c.170, s.1) 7.   R.S.19:15-20 is amended to read as follows: 19:15-20.    If a person shall be challenged as not qualified or entitled to vote, and the person challenging him shall specify a ground for such challenge to be that  the person so challenged is [an alien] a noncitizen, the judge of election may forthwith  tender to him an oath or affirmation, in the following form: "You do swear  (or affirm, as the case may be), that to the best of your knowledge, information and belief, you were born a citizen of the United States, and that you do not owe allegiance to any foreign prince, potentate, state or sovereignty", and if the person so challenged shall refuse to take the oath or  affirmation so tendered to him, he shall be deemed to be [an alien] a noncitizen, unless he shall produce at the time of claiming his vote, to the board, a lawful certificate, issued out of and under the seal of some court of record, having authority to admit [aliens] noncitizens to the rights of a citizen of the United States, showing that he has been admitted to the rights of a citizen of the United States.  In this case the judge shall tender to the person so challenged an oath or affirmation in the following form: "You do swear (or affirm, as the case may be), that you are the person named in the certificate of naturalization which you have produced to the board."   In case the person producing the same shall claim to have derived the rights of such citizen through the naturalization of his parent, such certificate shall show that the person alleged to be such parent has been admitted to the rights of such citizen.  In this event, an oath or affirmation, in the following form, shall be tendered to such person: "You do swear (or affirm, as the case may be), that to the best of your knowledge, information and belief, the person named in the certificate of naturalization which you have produced to this board was your parent, and that you were at the time of the naturalization of your parent under the age of twenty-one years, and resident of the United States."   If the person so challenged shall in either case refuse to take the oath or affirmation so tendered to him, he shall be deemed to be [an alien] a noncitizen. (cf: R.S.19:15-20) 8.   R.S.30:4-49 is amended to read as follows: 30:4-49.      Except as hereinafter provided, legal settlement in a county within the meaning of this article shall be continuous residence in such county for a period of not less than five years immediately preceding the date of application for admission or commitment, excluding the time, if any, spent by the patient in any charitable, or correctional institution or public hospital. [An alien] A noncitizen who has taken up his residence in any county in this State immediately upon arriving in this country, having had such county as his destination, and who shall have resided in such county for a period of at least three years immediately preceding the date of application for admission or commitment, shall be deemed to have a legal settlement in such county. (cf: P.L.1995, c.155, s.10) 9.   Section 3 of P.L.1968, c.413 (C.30:4D-3) is amended to read as follows: 3.    Definitions. As used in P.L.1968, c.413 (C.30:4D-1 et seq.), and unless the context otherwise requires: a.     "Applicant" means any person who has made application for purposes of becoming a "qualified applicant." b.    "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Human Services. c.     "Department" means the Department of Human Services, which is herein designated as the single State agency to administer the provisions of this act. d.    "Director" means the Director of the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services. e.     "Division" means the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services. f.     "Medicaid" means the New Jersey Medical Assistance and Health Services Program. g.    "Medical assistance" means payments on behalf of recipients to providers for medical care and services authorized under P.L.1968, c.413. h.    "Provider" means any person, public or private institution, agency, or business concern approved by the division lawfully providing medical care, services, goods, and supplies authorized under P.L.1968, c.413, holding, where applicable, a current valid license to provide such services or to dispense such goods or supplies. i.     "Qualified applicant" means a person who is a resident of this State, and either a citizen of the United States or an eligible [alien] noncitizen, and is determined to need medical care and services as provided under P.L.1968, c.413, with respect to whom the period for which eligibility to be a recipient is determined shall be the maximum period permitted under federal law, and who: (1)   Is a dependent child or parent or caretaker relative of a dependent child who would be, except for resources, eligible for the aid to families with dependent children program under the State Plan for Title IV-A of the federal Social Security Act as of July 16, 1996; (2)   Is a recipient of Supplemental Security Income for the Aged, Blind and Disabled under Title XVI of the Social Security Act; (3)   Is an "ineligible spouse" of a recipient of Supplemental Security Income for the Aged, Blind and Disabled under Title XVI of the Social Security Act, as defined by the federal Social Security Administration; (4)   Would be eligible to receive Supplemental Security Income under Title XVI of the federal Social Security Act or, without regard to resources, would be eligible for the aid to families with dependent children program under the State Plan for Title IV-A of the federal Social Security Act as of July 16, 1996, except for failure to meet an eligibility condition or requirement imposed under such State program which is prohibited under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act such as a durational residency requirement, relative responsibility, consent to imposition of a lien; (5)   (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2000, c.71). (6)   Is an individual under 21 years of age who, without regard to resources, would be, except for dependent child requirements, eligible for the aid to families with dependent children program under the State Plan for Title IV-A of the federal Social Security Act as of July 16, 1996, or groups of such individuals, including but not limited to, children in resource family placement under supervision of the Division of Child Protection and Permanency in the Department of Children and Families whose maintenance is being paid in whole or in part from public funds, children placed in a resource family home or institution by a private adoption agency in New Jersey or children in intermediate care facilities, including developmental centers for the developmentally disabled, or in psychiatric hospitals; (7)   Would be eligible for the Supplemental Security Income program, but is not receiving such assistance and applies for medical assistance only; (8)   Is determined to be medically needy and meets all the eligibility requirements described below: (a)   The following individuals are eligible for services, if they are determined to be medically needy: (i)    Pregnant women; (ii) Dependent children under the age of 21; (iii) Individuals who are 65 years of age and older; and (iv) Individuals who are blind or disabled pursuant to either 42 C.F.R.435.530 et seq. or 42 C.F.R.435.540 et seq., respectively. (b)   The following income standard shall be used to determine medically needy eligibility: (i)    For one person and two person households, the income standard shall be the maximum allowable under federal law, but shall not exceed 133 1/3% of the State's payment level to two person households under the aid to families with dependent children program under the State Plan for Title IV-A of the federal Social Security Act in effect as of July 16, 1996; and (ii) For households of three or more persons, the income standard shall be set at 133 1/3% of the State's payment level to similar size households under the aid to families with dependent children program under the State Plan for Title IV-A of the federal Social Security Act in effect as of July 16, 1996. (c)   The following resource standard shall be used to determine medically needy eligibility: (i)    For one person households, the resource standard shall be 200% of the resource standard for recipients of Supplemental Security Income pursuant to 42 U.S.C. s.1382(1)(B); (ii) For two person households, the resource standard shall be 200% of the resource standard for recipients of Supplemental Security Income pursuant to 42 U.S.C. s.1382(2)(B); (iii) For households of three or more persons, the resource standard in subparagraph (c)(ii) above shall be increased by $100.00 for each additional person; and (iv) The resource standards established in (i), (ii), and (iii) are subject to federal approval and the resource standard may be lower if required by the federal Department of Health and Human Services. (d)   Individuals whose income exceeds those established in subparagraph (b) of paragraph (8) of this subsection may become medically needy by incurring medical expenses as defined in 42 C.F.R.435.831(c) which will reduce their income to the applicable medically needy income established in subparagraph (b) of paragraph (8) of this subsection. (e)   A six-month period shall be used to determine whether an individual is medically needy. (f)   Eligibility determinations for the medically needy program shall be administered as follows: (i)    County welfare agencies and other entities designated by the commissioner are responsible for determining and certifying the eligibility of pregnant women and dependent children.  The division shall reimburse county welfare agencies for 100% of the reasonable costs of administration which are not reimbursed by the federal government for the first 12 months of this program's operation. Thereafter, 75% of the administrative costs incurred by county welfare agencies which are not reimbursed by the federal government shall be reimbursed by the division; (ii) The division is responsible for certifying the eligibility of individuals who are 65 years of age and older and individuals who are blind or disabled.  The division may enter into contracts with county welfare agencies to determine certain aspects of eligibility. In such instances the division shall provide county welfare agencies with all information the division may have available on the individual. The division shall notify all eligible recipients of the Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged and Disabled program, P.L.1975, c.194 (C.30:4D-20 et seq.) on an annual basis of the medically needy program and the program's general requirements.  The division shall take all reasonable administrative actions to ensure that Pharmaceutical Assistance to the Aged and Disabled recipients, who notify the division that they may be eligible for the program, have their applications processed expeditiously, at times and locations convenient to the recipients; and (iii) The division is responsible for certifying incurred medical expenses for all eligible persons who attempt to qualify for the program pursuant to subparagraph (d) of paragraph (8) of this subsection; (9)   (a) Is a child who is at least one year of age and under 19 years of age and, if older than six years of age but under 19 years of age, is uninsured; and (b)   Is a member of a family whose income does not exceed 133% of the poverty level and who meets the federal Medicaid eligibility requirements set forth in section 9401 of Pub.L.99-509 (42 U.S.C. s.1396a); (10) Is a pregnant woman who is determined by a provider to be presumptively eligible for medical assistance based on criteria established by the commissioner, pursuant to section 9407 of Pub.L.99-509 (42 U.S.C. s.1396a(a)); (11) Is an individual 65 years of age and older, or an individual who is blind or disabled pursuant to section 301 of Pub.L.92-603 (42 U.S.C. s.1382c), whose income does not exceed 100% of the poverty level, adjusted for family size, and whose resources do not exceed 100% of the resource standard used to determine medically needy eligibility pursuant to paragraph (8) of this subsection; (12) Is a qualified disabled and working individual pursuant to section 6408 of Pub.L.101-239 (42 U.S.C. s.1396d) whose income does not exceed 200% of the poverty level and whose resources do not exceed 200% of the resource standard used to determine eligibility under the Supplemental Security Income Program, P.L.1973, c.256 (C.44:7-85 et seq.); (13) Is a pregnant woman or is a child who is under one year of age and is a member of a family whose income does not exceed 185% of the poverty level and who meets the federal Medicaid eligibility requirements set forth in section 9401 of Pub.L.99-509 (42 U.S.C. s.1396a), except that a pregnant woman who is determined to be a qualified applicant shall, notwithstanding any change in the income of the family of which she is a member, continue to be deemed a qualified applicant until the end of the 60-day period beginning on the last day of her pregnancy; (14) (Deleted by amendment, P.L.1997, c.272). (15) (a) Is a specified low-income Medicare beneficiary pursuant to 42 U.S.C. s.1396a(a)10(E)iii whose resources beginning January 1, 1993 do not exceed 200% of the resource standard used to determine eligibility under the Supplemental Security Income program, P.L.1973, c.256 (C.44:7-85 et seq.) and whose income beginning January 1, 1993 does not exceed 110% of the poverty level, and beginning January 1, 1995 does not exceed 120% of the poverty level. (b)   An individual who has, within 36 months, or within 60 months in the case of funds transferred into a trust, of applying to be a qualified applicant for Medicaid services in a nursing facility or a medical institution, or for home or community-based services under section 1915(c) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. s.1396n(c)), disposed of resources or income for less than fair market value shall be ineligible for assistance for nursing facility services, an equivalent level of services in a medical institution, or home or community-based services under section 1915(c) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. s.1396n(c)). The period of the ineligibility shall be the number of months resulting from dividing the uncompensated value of the transferred resources or income by the average monthly private payment rate for nursing facility services in the State as determined annually by the commissioner. In the case of multiple resource or income transfers, the resulting penalty periods shall be imposed sequentially.  Application of this requirement shall be governed by 42 U.S.C. s.1396p(c).  In accordance with federal law, this provision is effective for all transfers of resources or income made on or after August 11, 1993.  Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection to the contrary, the State eligibility requirements concerning resource or income transfers shall not be more restrictive than those enacted pursuant to 42 U.S.C. s.1396p(c). (c)   An individual seeking nursing facility services or home or community-based services and who has a community spouse shall be required to expend those resources which are not protected for the needs of the community spouse in accordance with section 1924(c) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. s.1396r-5(c)) on the costs of long-term care, burial arrangements, and any other expense deemed appropriate and authorized by the commissioner.  An individual shall be ineligible for Medicaid services in a nursing facility or for home or community-based services under section 1915(c) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. s.1396n(c)) if the individual expends funds in violation of this subparagraph.  The period of ineligibility shall be the number of months resulting from dividing the uncompensated value of transferred resources and income by the average monthly private payment rate for nursing facility services in the State as determined by the commissioner.  The period of ineligibility shall begin with the month that the individual would otherwise be eligible for Medicaid coverage for nursing facility services or home or community-based services. This subparagraph shall be operative only if all necessary approvals are received from the federal government including, but not limited to, approval of necessary State plan amendments and approval of any waivers; (16) Subject to federal approval under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, is a dependent child, parent or specified caretaker relative of a child who is a qualified applicant, who would be eligible, without regard to resources, for the aid to families with dependent children program under the State Plan for Title IV-A of the federal Social Security Act as of July 16, 1996, except for the income eligibility requirements of that program, and whose family earned income, (a)   if a dependent child, does not exceed 133% of the poverty level; and (b)   if a parent or specified caretaker relative, beginning September 1, 2005 does not exceed 100% of the poverty level, beginning September 1, 2006 does not exceed 115% of the poverty level and beginning September 1, 2007 does not exceed 133% of the poverty level, plus such earned income disregards as shall be determined according to a methodology to be established by regulation of the commissioner; The commissioner may increase the income eligibility limits for children and parents and specified caretaker relatives, as funding permits; (17) Is an individual from 18 through 20 years of age who is not a dependent child and would be eligible for medical assistance pursuant to P.L.1968, c.413 (C.30:4D-1 et seq.), without regard to income or resources, who, on the individual's 18th birthday was in resource family care under the care and custody of the Division of Child Protection and Permanency in the Department of Children and Families and whose maintenance was being paid in whole or in part from public funds; (18) Is a person between the ages of 16 and 65 who is permanently disabled and working, and: (a)   whose income is at or below 250% of the poverty level, plus other established disregards; (b)   who pays the premium contribution and other cost sharing as established by the commissioner, subject to the limits and conditions of federal law; and (c)   whose assets, resources and unearned income do not exceed limitations as established by the commissioner; (19) Is an uninsured individual under 65 years of age who: (a)   has been screened for breast or cervical cancer under the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention breast and cervical cancer early detection program; (b)   requires treatment for breast or cervical cancer based upon criteria established by the commissioner; (c)   has an income that does not exceed the income standard established by the commissioner pursuant to federal guidelines; (d)   meets all other Medicaid eligibility requirements; and (e)   in accordance with Pub.L.106-354, is determined by a qualified entity to be presumptively eligible for medical assistance pursuant to 42 U.S.C. s.1396a(aa), based upon criteria established by the commissioner pursuant to section 1920B of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. s.1396r-1b); (20) Subject to federal approval under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, is a single adult or couple, without dependent children, whose income in 2006 does not exceed 50% of the poverty level, in 2007 does not exceed 75% of the poverty level and in 2008 and each year thereafter does not exceed 100% of the poverty level; except that a person who is a recipient of Work First New Jersey general public assistance, pursuant to P.L.1947, c.156 (C.44:8-107 et seq.), shall not be a qualified applicant; or (21) is an individual who: (a)   has an income that does not exceed the highest income eligibility level for pregnant women established under the State plan under Title XIX or Title XXI of the federal Social Security Act; (b)   is not pregnant; and (c)   is eligible to receive family planning services provided under the Medicaid program pursuant to subsection k. of section 6 of P.L.1968, c.413 (C.30:4D-6) and in accordance with 42 U.S.C. s.1396a(ii). j.     "Recipient" means any qualified applicant receiving benefits under this act. k.    "Resident" means a person who is living in the State voluntarily with the intention of making his home here and not for a temporary purpose.  Temporary absences from the State, with subsequent returns to the State or intent to return when the purposes of the absences have been accomplished, do not interrupt continuity of residence. l.     "State Medicaid Commission" means the Governor, the Commissioner of Human Services, the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the General Assembly, hereby constituted a commission to approve and direct the means and method for the payment of claims pursuant to P.L.1968, c.413. m.   "Third party" means any person, institution, corporation, insurance company, group health plan as defined in section 607(1) of the federal "Employee Retirement and Income Security Act of 1974," 29 U.S.C. s.1167(1), service benefit plan, health maintenance organization, or other prepaid health plan, or public, private or governmental entity who is or may be liable in contract, tort, or otherwise by law or equity to pay all or part of the medical cost of injury, disease or disability of an applicant for or recipient of medical assistance payable under P.L.1968, c.413. n.    "Governmental peer grouping system" means a separate class of skilled nursing and intermediate care facilities administered by the State or county governments, established for the purpose of screening their reported costs and setting reimbursement rates under the Medicaid program that are reasonable and adequate to meet the costs that must be incurred by efficiently and economically operated State or county skilled nursing and intermediate care facilities. o.    "Comprehensive maternity or pediatric care provider" means any person or public or private health care facility that is a provider and that is approved by the commissioner to provide comprehensive maternity care or comprehensive pediatric care as defined in subsection b. (18) and (19) of section 6 of P.L.1968, c.413 (C.30:4D-6). p.    "Poverty level" means the official poverty level based on family size established and adjusted under Section 673(2) of Subtitle B, the "Community Services Block Grant Act," of Pub.L.97-35 (42 U.S.C. s.9902(2)). q.    "Eligible [alien] noncitizen" means one of the following: (1) [an alien] A noncitizen present in the United States prior to August 22, 1996, who is: (a)   a lawful permanent resident; (b)   a refugee pursuant to section 207 of the federal "Immigration and Nationality Act" (8 U.S.C. s.1157); (c)   an asylee pursuant to section 208 of the federal "Immigration and Nationality Act" (8 U.S.C. s.1158); (d)   [an alien] a noncitizen who has had deportation withheld pursuant to section 243(h) of the federal "Immigration and Nationality Act" (8 U.S.C. s.1253 (h)); (e)   [an alien] a noncitizen who has been granted parole for less than one year by the U.S. Citizenship and Immigration Services pursuant to section 212(d)(5) of the federal "Immigration and Nationality Act" (8 U.S.C. s.1182(d)(5)); (f)   [an alien] a noncitizen granted conditional entry pursuant to section 203(a)(7) of the federal "Immigration and Nationality Act" (8 U.S.C. s.1153(a)(7)) in effect prior to April 1, 1980; or (g)   [an alien] a noncitizen who is honorably discharged from or on active duty in the United States armed forces and the [alien's] noncitizens spouse and unmarried dependent child. (2)   [An alien] A noncitizen who entered the United States on or after August 22, 1996, who is: (a)   [an alien] a noncitizen as described in paragraph (1)(b), (c), (d) or (g) of this subsection; or (b)   [an alien] a noncitizen as described in paragraph (1)(a), (e) or (f) of this subsection who entered the United States at least five years ago. (3)   A legal [alien] noncitizen who is a victim of domestic violence in accordance with criteria specified for eligibility for public benefits as provided in Title V of the federal "Illegal Immigration Reform and Immigrant Responsibility Act of 1996" (8 U.S.C. s.1641). (cf: P.L.2021, c.344, s.1) 10. Section 2 of P.L.1997, c.352 (C.30:4D-6f) is amended to read as follows: 2.    An eligible [alien] noncitizen as defined in section 3 of P.L.1968, c.413 (C.30:4D-1 et seq.) who otherwise meets all eligibility criteria therefor is entitled to medical assistance provided pursuant to section 6 of P.L.1968, c.413 (C.30:4D-6).  [An alien]  A noncitizen who does not qualify as an eligible [alien] noncitizen but who is a resident of New Jersey and would otherwise be eligible for medical assistance provided pursuant to section 6 of P.L.1968, c.413 is entitled only to care and services necessary for the treatment of an emergency medical condition as defined in section 1903(v)(3) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. s.1396b(v)(3)). (cf: P.L.1997, c.352, s.2) 11.  Section 2 of P.L.2002, c.81 (C.34:8-79) is amended to read as follows: 2.    a.  The Director of the Division of Consumer Affairs in the Department of Law and Public Safety, in consultation with the Commissioner of Health and Senior Services, shall require that, no later than the 180th day after the date of enactment of this act, each health care service firm regulated by the Division of Consumer Affairs shall provide the following information to each patient receiving home-based services from that firm, or to a person designated by the patient: (1)   the name and certification or licensure title, as applicable, of the homemaker-home health aide or other health care professional whose practice is regulated pursuant to Title 45 of the Revised Statutes, to be displayed on an identification tag as required by regulation of the New Jersey Board of Nursing, or as otherwise to be prescribed by regulation of the director for other health care professionals, that the homemaker-home health aide or other health care professional shall wear at all times while examining, observing or caring for the patient; and (2)   a copy of the most current edition of the consumer guide to homemaker-home health aides published by the New Jersey Board of Nursing. b.    The Director of the Division of Consumer Affairs in the Department of Law and Public Safety, in consultation with the Commissioner of Health and Senior Services, shall require that, no later than the 180th day after the date of enactment of this act, each health care service firm, employment agency or registry and temporary help service firm or personnel consultant regulated by the Division of Consumer Affairs shall provide the following information in writing to each consumer receiving home-based services, including, but not limited to, domestic, companion, sitter and live-in services, from a person who is employed by that firm, agency, registry or consultant and is not a certified homemaker-home health aide or other health care professional whose practice is regulated pursuant to Title 45 of the Revised Statutes, or to a person designated by the consumer: (1)   notification that the person is not a certified homemaker-home health aide or other health care professional whose practice is regulated pursuant to Title 45 of the Revised Statutes; (2)   any training received by that person which the firm, agency, registry or consultant deems relevant to the provision of those services that the person is assigned to provide to the consumer; (3)   proof that the person is a United States citizen or legally documented [alien] noncitizen; and (4)   evidence of employment history verification or character references for that person. c.     The information provided pursuant to subsections a. and b. of this section shall be provided: (1)   in advance of the provision of services to the patient or consumer, as applicable, whenever possible; and (2)   otherwise upon the initial visit to the patient's or consumer's home of the person assigned to provide services to the patient or consumer. d.    Beginning on the first day of the 13th month after the date of enactment of this act, the identification tag required pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall include a photograph of the homemaker-home health aide or other health care professional. e.     The director, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), shall adopt rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this section. (cf: P.L.2002, c.81, s.2) 12. R.S.43:21-4 is amended to read as follows: 43:21-4. Benefit eligibility conditions. An unemployed individual shall be eligible to receive benefits with respect to any week eligible only if: (a)   The individual has filed a claim at an unemployment insurance claims office and thereafter continues to report at an employment service office or unemployment insurance claims office, as directed by the division in accordance with such regulations as the division may prescribe, except that the division may, by regulation, waive or alter either or both of the requirements of this subsection as to individuals attached to regular jobs, and as to such other types of cases or situations with respect to which the division finds that compliance with such requirements would be oppressive, or would be inconsistent with the purpose of this act; provided that no such regulation shall conflict with subsection (a) of R.S.43:21-3. (b)   The individual has made a claim for benefits in accordance with the provisions of subsection (a) of R.S.43:21-6. (c) (1) The individual is able to work, and is available for work, and has demonstrated to be actively seeking work, except as hereinafter provided in this subsection or in subsection (f) of this section. (2)   The director may modify the requirement of actively seeking work if such modification of this requirement is warranted by economic conditions. (3)   No individual, who is otherwise eligible, shall be deemed ineligible, or unavailable for work, because the individual is on vacation, without pay, during said week, if said vacation is not the result of the individual's own action as distinguished from any collective action of a collective bargaining agent or other action beyond the individual's control. (4) (A) Subject to such limitations and conditions as the division may prescribe, an individual, who is otherwise eligible, shall not be deemed unavailable for work or ineligible because the individual is attending a training program approved for the individual by the division to enhance the individual's employment opportunities or because the individual failed or refused to accept work while attending such program. (B)  For the purpose of this paragraph (4), any training program shall be regarded as approved by the division for the individual if the program and the individual meet the following requirements: (i)    The training is for a labor demand occupation and is likely to enhance the individual's marketable skills and earning power, except that the training may be for an occupation other than a labor demand occupation if the individual is receiving short-time benefits pursuant to the provisions of P.L.2011, c.154 (C.43:21-20.3 et al.) and the training is necessary to prevent a likely loss of jobs; (ii)   The training is provided by a competent and reliable private or public entity approved by the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development pursuant to the provisions of section 8 of the "1992 New Jersey Employment and Workforce Development Act," P.L.1992, c.43 (C.34:15D-8); (iii)  The individual can reasonably be expected to complete the program, either during or after the period of benefits; (iv)  The training does not include on the job training or other training under which the individual is paid by an employer for work performed by the individual during the time that the individual receives benefits; and (v)   The individual enrolls in vocational training, remedial education or a combination of both on a full-time basis, except that the training or education may be on a part-time basis if the individual is receiving short-time benefits pursuant to the provisions of P.L.2011, c.154 (C.43:21-20.3 et al.). (C)  If the requirements of subparagraph (B) of this paragraph (4) are met, the division shall not withhold approval of the training program for the individual for any of the following reasons: (i)    The training includes remedial basic skills education necessary for the individual to successfully complete the vocational component of the training; (ii)   The training is provided in connection with a program under which the individual may obtain a college degree, including a post-graduate degree; (iii)  The length of the training period under the program; or (iv)  The lack of a prior guarantee of employment upon completion of the training. (D)  For the purpose of this paragraph (4), "labor demand occupation" means an occupation for which there is or is likely to be an excess of demand over supply for adequately trained workers, including, but not limited to, an occupation designated as a labor demand occupation by the Center for Occupational Employment Information pursuant to the provisions of subsection d. of section 27 of P.L.2005, c.354 (C.34:1A-86). (5)   An unemployed individual, who is otherwise eligible, shall not be deemed unavailable for work or ineligible solely by reason of the individual's attendance before a court in response to a summons for service on a jury. (6)   An unemployed individual, who is otherwise eligible, shall not be deemed unavailable for work or ineligible solely by reason of the individual's attendance at the funeral of an immediate family member, provided that the duration of the attendance does not extend beyond a two-day period. For purposes of this paragraph, "immediate family member" includes any of the following individuals: father, mother, mother-in-law, father-in-law, grandmother, grandfather, grandchild, spouse, child, child placed by the Division of Youth and Family Services in the Department of Children and Families, sister or brother of the unemployed individual and any relatives of the unemployed individual residing in the unemployed individual's household. (7)   No individual, who is otherwise eligible, shall be deemed ineligible or unavailable for work with respect to any week because, during that week, the individual fails or refuses to accept work while the individual is participating on a full-time basis in self-employment assistance activities authorized by the division, whether or not the individual is receiving a self-employment allowance during that week. (8)   Any individual who is determined to be likely to exhaust regular benefits and need reemployment services based on information obtained by the worker profiling system shall not be eligible to receive benefits if the individual fails to participate in available reemployment services to which the individual is referred by the division or in similar services, unless the division determines that: (A)  The individual has completed the reemployment services; or (B)  There is justifiable cause for the failure to participate, which shall include participation in employment and training, self-employment assistance activities or other activities authorized by the division to assist reemployment or enhance the marketable skills and earning power of the individual and which shall include any other circumstance indicated pursuant to this section in which an individual is not required to be available for and actively seeking work to receive benefits. (9)   An unemployed individual, who is otherwise eligible, shall not be deemed unavailable for work or ineligible solely by reason of the individual's work as a board worker for a county board of elections on an election day. (10) An individual who is employed by a shared work employer and is otherwise eligible for benefits shall not be deemed ineligible for short-time benefits because the individual is unavailable for work with employers other than the shared work employer, so long as: (A)  The individual is able to work and is available to work the individual's normal full-time hours for the shared work employer; or (B)  The individual is attending a training program which is in compliance with the provisions of paragraph (4) of subsection (c) of this section and the agreements and certifications required pursuant to the provisions of section 2 of P.L.2011, c.154 (C.43:21-20.4). (d)   With respect to any benefit year commencing before January 1, 2002, the individual has been totally or partially unemployed for a waiting period of one week in the benefit year which includes that week. When benefits become payable with respect to the third consecutive week next following the waiting period, the individual shall be eligible to receive benefits as appropriate with respect to the waiting period.  No week shall be counted as a week of unemployment for the purposes of this subsection: (1)   If benefits have been paid, or are payable with respect thereto; provided that the requirements of this paragraph shall be waived with respect to any benefits paid or payable for a waiting period as provided in this subsection; (2)   If it has constituted a waiting period week under the "Temporary Disability Benefits Law," P.L.1948, c.110 (C.43:21-25 et al.); (3)   Unless the individual fulfills the requirements of subsections (a) and (c) of this section; (4)   If with respect thereto, claimant was disqualified for benefits in accordance with the provisions of subsection (d) of R.S.43:21-5. The waiting period provided by this subsection shall not apply to benefit years commencing on or after January 1, 2002.  An individual whose total benefit amount was reduced by the application of the waiting period to a claim which occurred on or after January 1, 2002 and before the effective date of P.L.2002, c.13, shall be permitted to file a claim for the additional benefits attributable to the waiting period in the form and manner prescribed by the division, but not later than the 180th day following the effective date of P.L.2002, c.13 unless the division determines that there is good cause for a later filing. (e) (1) (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2001, c.17). (2)   (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2008, c.17). (3)   (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2008, c.17). (4)   With respect to benefit years commencing on or after January 7, 2001, except as otherwise provided in paragraph (5) of this subsection, the individual has, during his base year as defined in subsection (c) of R.S.43:21-19: (A)  Established at least 20 base weeks as defined in paragraphs (2) and (3) of subsection (t) of R.S.43:21-19; or (B)  If the individual has not met the requirements of subparagraph (A) of this paragraph (4), earned remuneration not less than an amount 1,000 times the minimum wage in effect pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1966, c.113 (C.34:11-56a4) on October 1 of the calendar year preceding the calendar year in which the benefit year commences, which amount shall be adjusted to the next higher multiple of $100 if not already a multiple thereof. (5)   With respect to benefit years commencing on or after January 7, 2001, notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (4) of this subsection, an unemployed individual claiming benefits on the basis of service performed in the production and harvesting of agricultural crops shall, subject to the limitations of subsection (i) of R.S.43:21-19, be eligible to receive benefits if during his base year, as defined in subsection (c) of R.S.43:21-19, the individual: (A)  Has established at least 20 base weeks as defined in paragraphs (2) and (3) of subsection (t) of R.S.43:21-19; or (B)  Has earned remuneration not less than an amount 1,000 times the minimum wage in effect pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1966, c.113 (C.34:11-56a4) on October 1 of the calendar year preceding the calendar year in which the benefit year commences, which amount shall be adjusted to the next higher multiple of $100 if not already a multiple thereof; or (C)  Has performed at least 770 hours of service in the production and harvesting of agricultural crops. (6)   The individual applying for benefits in any successive benefit year has earned at least six times his previous weekly benefit amount and has had four weeks of employment since the beginning of the immediately preceding benefit year.  This provision shall be in addition to the earnings requirements specified in paragraph (4) or (5) of this subsection, as applicable. (f) (1) The individual has suffered any accident or sickness not compensable under the workers' compensation law, R.S.34:15-1 et seq. and resulting in the individual's total disability to perform any work for remuneration, and would be eligible to receive benefits under this chapter (R.S.43:21-1 et seq.) (without regard to the maximum amount of benefits payable during any benefit year) except for the inability to work and has furnished notice and proof of claim to the division, in accordance with its rules and regulations, and payment is not precluded by the provisions of R.S.43:21-3(d); provided, however, that benefits paid under this subsection (f) shall be computed on the basis of only those base year wages earned by the claimant as a "covered individual," as defined in subsection (b) of section 3 of P.L.1948, c.110 (C.43:21-27); provided further that no benefits shall be payable under this subsection to any individual: (A)  For any period during which such individual is not under the care of a legally licensed physician, dentist, optometrist, podiatrist, practicing psychologist, advanced practice nurse, or chiropractor, who, when requested by the division, shall certify within the scope of the practitioner's practice, the disability of the individual, the probable duration thereof, and, where applicable, the medical facts within the practitioner's knowledge; (B)  (Deleted by amendment, P.L.1980, c.90.) (C)  For any period of disability due to willfully or intentionally self-inflicted injury, or to injuries sustained in the perpetration by the individual of a crime of the first, second or third degree; (D)  For any week with respect to which or a part of which the individual has received or is seeking benefits under any unemployment compensation or disability benefits law of any other state or of the United States; provided that if the appropriate agency of such other state or the United States finally determines that the individual is not entitled to such benefits, this disqualification shall not apply; (E)  For any week with respect to which or part of which the individual has received or is seeking disability benefits under the "Temporary Disability Benefits Law," P.L.1948, c.110 (C.43:21-25 et al.); (F)   For any period of disability commencing while such individual is a "covered individual," as defined in subsection (b) of section 3 of the "Temporary Disability Benefits Law," P.L.1948, c.110 (C.43:21-27). (2)   The individual is taking family temporary disability leave to provide care for a family member with a serious health condition or to be with a child during the first 12 months after the child's birth or placement of the child for adoption or as a foster child with the individual, and the individual would be eligible to receive benefits under R.S.43:21-1 et seq. (without regard to the maximum amount of benefits payable during any benefit year) except for the individual's unavailability for work while taking the family temporary disability leave, and the individual has furnished notice and proof of claim to the division, in accordance with its rules and regulations, and payment is not precluded by the provisions of R.S.43:21-3(d) provided, however, that benefits paid under this subsection (f) shall be computed on the basis of only those base year wages earned by the claimant as a "covered individual," as defined in subsection (b) of section 3 of P.L.1948, c.110 (C.43:21-27); provided further that no benefits shall be payable under this subsection to any individual: (A)  For any week with respect to which or a part of which the individual has received or is seeking benefits under any unemployment compensation or disability benefits law of any other state or of the United States; provided that if the appropriate agency of such other state or the United States finally determines that the individual is not entitled to such benefits, this disqualification shall not apply; (B)  For any week with respect to which or part of which the individual has received or is seeking disability benefits for a disability of the individual under the "Temporary Disability Benefits Law," P.L.1948, c.110 (C.43:21-25 et al.); (C)  For any period of family temporary disability leave commencing while the individual is a "covered individual," as defined in subsection (b) of section 3 of the "Temporary Disability Benefits Law," P.L.1948, c.110 (C.43:21-27); or (D)  For any period of family temporary disability leave for a serious health condition of a family member of the claimant during which the family member is not receiving inpatient care in a hospital, hospice, or residential medical care facility and is not subject to continuing medical treatment or continuing supervision by a health care provider, who, when requested by the division, shall certify within the scope of the provider's practice, the serious health condition of the family member, the probable duration thereof, and, where applicable, the medical facts within the provider's knowledge. (3)   Benefit payments under this subsection (f) shall be charged to and paid from the State disability benefits fund established by the "Temporary Disability Benefits Law," P.L.1948, c.110 (C.43:21-25 et al.), and shall not be charged to any employer account in computing any employer's experience rate for contributions payable under this chapter. (g)   Benefits based on service in employment defined in subparagraphs (B) and (C) of R.S.43:21-19 (i)(1) shall be payable in the same amount and on the terms and subject to the same conditions as benefits payable on the basis of other service subject to the "unemployment compensation law"; except that, notwithstanding any other provisions of the "unemployment compensation law": (1)   With respect to service performed after December 31, 1977, in an instructional, research, or principal administrative capacity for an educational institution, benefits shall not be paid based on such services for any week of unemployment commencing during the period between two successive academic years, or during a similar period between two regular terms, whether or not successive, or during a period of paid sabbatical leave provided for in the individual's contract, to any individual if such individual performs such services in the first of such academic years (or terms) and if there is a contract or a reasonable assurance that such individual will perform services in any such capacity for any educational institution in the second of such academic years or terms; (2)   With respect to weeks of unemployment beginning after September 3, 1982, on the basis of service performed in any other capacity for an educational institution, benefits shall not be paid on the basis of such services to any individual for any week which commences during a period between two successive academic years or terms if such individual performs such services in the first of such academic years or terms and there is a reasonable assurance that such individual will perform such services in the second of such academic years or terms, except that if benefits are denied to any individual under this paragraph (2) and the individual was not offered an opportunity to perform these services for the educational institution for the second of any academic years or terms, the individual shall be entitled to a retroactive payment of benefits for each week for which the individual filed a timely claim for benefits and for which benefits were denied solely by reason of this clause; (3)   With respect to those services described in paragraphs (1) and (2) above, benefits shall not be paid on the basis of such services to any individual for any week which commences during an established and customary vacation period or holiday recess if such individual performs such services in the period immediately before such vacation period or holiday recess, and there is a reasonable assurance that such individual will perform such services in the period immediately following such period or holiday recess; (4)   With respect to any services described in paragraphs (1) and (2) above, benefits shall not be paid as specified in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) above to any individual who performed those services in an educational institution while in the employ of an educational service agency, and for this purpose the term "educational service agency" means a governmental agency or governmental entity which is established and operated exclusively for the purpose of providing those services to one or more educational institutions; (5)   As used in this subsection (g) in order for there to be a "reasonable assurance" all of the following requirements shall be met: (A)  The educational institution has made an offer of employment in the following academic year or term that is either written, oral, or implied; (B)  The offer of employment in the following academic year or term was made by an individual with actual authority to offer employment; (C)  The employment offered in the following academic year or term shall be in the same capacity; (D)  The economic conditions of the employment offered may not be considerably less in the following academic year or term than in the then current academic year or term.  For the purpose of this paragraph, "considerably less" means that the claimant will earn less than 90 percent of the amount the claimant earned in the then current academic year or term; (E)  The offer of employment in the following academic year or term is not contingent upon a factor or factors that are within the educational institution's control, including but not limited to, course programming, decisions on how to allocate available funding, final course offerings, program changes, and facility availability; and (F)   Based on a totality of the circumstances, it is highly probable that there is a job available for the claimant in the following academic year or term.  If a job offer contains a contingency, primary weight should be given to the contingent nature of the offer of employment. Contingencies that are not necessarily within the educational institution's control, such as funding, enrollment and seniority, may be taken into consideration but the existence of any one contingency should not determine whether it is highly probable that there is a job available for the claimant in the following academic year or term. (6)   Determinations by the department whether claimants have a "reasonable assurance" shall be done on a case-by-case basis. (7)   Each educational institution shall provide the following to the department, in a form, including electronic form, prescribed by the commissioner, no less than 10 business days prior to the end of the academic year or term: (A)  A list of all employees who the educational institution has concluded do not have a reasonable assurance of employment in the following academic year or term, along with information prescribed by the commissioner regarding each such employee, which information shall include, but not be limited to, name and social security number; and (B)  For each employee that the educational institution maintains does have a reasonable assurance of employment in the following academic year or term, a statement explaining the manner in which the employee was given a reasonable assurance of employment, that is, whether it was in writing, oral, or implied, and what information about the offer, including contingencies, was communicated to the individual. (8)   The statement required under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (7) of this subsection (g) may be used by the department in its analysis under paragraphs (5) and (6) of this subsection (g), but it does not conclusively demonstrate that the claimant has a reasonable assurance of employment in the following academic year or term. (9)   Failure of an educational institution to provide the statement required under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (7) of this subsection (g) not less than 10 business days prior to the end of the academic year or term shall result in a rebuttable presumption that the claimant does not have a reasonable assurance of employment in the following academic year or term.  This rebuttable presumption shall give rise to an inference that the claimant does not have a reasonable assurance of employment in the following academic year or term, but shall not conclusively demonstrate that the claimant does not have a reasonable assurance of employment in the following academic year or term. (10) If any part of P.L.2020, c.122 is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the State or the eligibility of employers in this State for federal unemployment tax credits, the conflicting part of that act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act.  Rules adopted under this act shall meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by the State or the granting of federal unemployment tax credits to employers in this State. (h)   Benefits shall not be paid to any individual on the basis of any services, substantially all of which consist of participating in sports or athletic events or training or preparing to so participate, for any week which commences during the period between two successive sports seasons (or similar periods) if such individual performed such services in the first of such seasons (or similar periods) and there is a reasonable assurance that such individual will perform such services in the later of such seasons (or similar periods). (i) (1) Benefits shall not be paid on the basis of services performed by [an alien] a noncitizen unless such [alien] noncitizen is an individual who was lawfully admitted for permanent residence at the time the services were performed and was lawfully present for the purpose of performing the services or otherwise was permanently residing in the United States under color of law at the time the services were performed (including [an alien] a noncitizen who is lawfully present in the United States as a result of the application of the provisions of section 212(d)(5) (8 U.S.C. s.1182 (d)(5)) of the Immigration and Nationality Act (8 U.S.C. s.1101 et seq.)); provided that any modifications of the provisions of section 3304(a)(14) of the Federal Unemployment Tax Act (26 U.S.C. s. 3304 (a) (14)) as provided by Pub.L.94-566, which specify other conditions or other effective dates than stated herein for the denial of benefits based on services performed by [aliens] noncitizens and which modifications are required to be implemented under State law as a condition for full tax credit against the tax imposed by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, shall be deemed applicable under the provisions of this section. (2)   Any data or information required of individuals applying for benefits to determine whether benefits are not payable to them because of their [alien] noncitizen status shall be uniformly required from all applicants for benefits. (3)   In the case of an individual whose application for benefits would otherwise be approved, no determination that benefits to such individual are not payable because of [alien] noncitizen status shall be made except upon a preponderance of the evidence. (j)    Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the director may, to the extent that it may be deemed efficient and economical, provide for consolidated administration by one or more representatives or deputies of claims made pursuant to subsection (f) of this section with those made pursuant to Article III (State plan) of the "Temporary Disability Benefits Law," P.L.1948, c.110 (C.43:21-25 et al.). (cf: P.L. 2020, c.122, s.1) 13. R..S.44:1-97 is amended to read as follows: 44:1-97.      Overseers shall in respect to all applicants for relief keep a record which may be by card index and which shall state: a.     The name, age, sex and residence; b.    The number and names of children and their ages; c.     The time and place of last employment and the family income; d.    Whether citizen or [alien] noncitizen and the place of nativity; e.     The place of abode for the ten years preceding the application for relief; f.     The cause direct and indirect which has operated to make relief necessary so far as can be ascertained; g.    The relief or aid given, and such relief as may have been or is being provided by all organizations as ascertained; h.    The name of the overseer or deputy and helper having particular knowledge and charge of the case, and of witnesses of the fact with their addresses; and i.     The name of those responsible by law for the support of the poor person  and the name of any relative agreeing or likely to agree to contribute in whole  or in part to, or assist in, the support of the poor person. (cf: R.S.44:1-97) 14.  R.S.44:4-50 is amended to read as follows: 44:4-50.      Directors of welfare shall keep a record which may be by card index and which shall state in respect to all applicants for relief: a.     The name, age, sex and residence; b.    The number and names of children and their ages; c.     The time and place of last employment, and the family income; d.    Whether citizen or [alien] noncitizen and the place of nativity; e.     The place of abode for the ten years preceding the application for relief; f.     The causes direct and indirect which operated to make relief necessary so far as can be ascertained; g.    The relief or aid given, and such relief as may have been or is being provided by all organizations as ascertained; h.    The names of the director or deputy and helper having particular knowledge and charge of the case, and of witnesses of the fact with their addresses; and i.     The names of those responsible by law for the support of the poor person and of any relative agreeing or likely to agree to contribute in whole or in part to, or assist in, the support of the poor person. (cf: R.S.44:4-50) 15. Section 7 of P.L.1997, c.13 (C.44:10-40) is amended to read as follows: 7.    a.  Single adults and couples without dependent children shall not be eligible for medical assistance for inpatient or outpatient hospital care or long-term care under the program, except that medical assistance shall be provided for the following, in accordance with regulations adopted by the commissioner: (1)   inpatient hospitalization costs for a recipient of general public assistance pursuant to P.L.1947, c.156 (C.44:8-107 et seq.) who is admitted to a special hospital licensed by the Department of Health and Senior Services which is not eligible to receive a charity care subsidy from the Health Care Subsidy Fund established pursuant to P.L.1992, c.160 (C.26:2H-18.51 et al.) and to which payments were made prior to July 1, 1991 on behalf of patients receiving general public assistance; (2)   nursing home costs for a person residing in a non-Medicaid certified nursing facility prior to July 1, 1995, whose income is above the Medicaid institutional cap and who does not otherwise qualify for State-funded nursing home care as a medically needy person pursuant to P.L.1968, c.413 (C.30:4D-1 et seq.), to be paid for out of a separate account from the Medicaid program; which assistance shall continue until the person is no longer eligible for long-term care; and (3)   nursing home costs for [an alien] a noncitizen residing in a Medicaid certified nursing facility prior to the effective date of this act who is not Medicaid-eligible under Pub.L.104-193; which assistance shall continue until the person is no longer eligible for long-term care. b.    The provisions of this section shall not affect the eligibility of a single adult or a couple without dependent children for the New Jersey FamilyCare Health Coverage Program established pursuant to section 4 of P.L.2000, c.71 (C.30:4J-4). (cf: P.L.2000, c.71, s.8) 16. Section 1 of P.L.1997, c.14 (C.44:10-44) is amended to read as follows: 1.    As used in this act: "Applicant" means an applicant for benefits provided by the Work First New Jersey program. "Assistance unit" means: a single person without dependent children; a couple without dependent children; dependent children only; or a person or couple with one or more dependent children who are legally or blood-related, or who is their legal guardian, and who live together as a household unit. "Benefits" means any assistance provided to needy persons and their dependent children and needy single persons and couples without dependent children under the Work First New Jersey program. "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Human Services. "County agency" means the county agency that was administering the aid to families with dependent children program at the time the federal "Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996," Pub.L.104-193, was enacted and which, upon  the enactment of P.L.1997, c.14 (C.44:10-44 et al.) shall also administer the Work First New Jersey program in that county. "Dependent child" means a child: a.     under the age of 18; b.    under the age of 19 and a full-time student in a secondary school or an equivalent level of vocational or technical training, if, before the student attains age 19, the student may reasonably be expected to complete the student's program of secondary school or training; or c.     under the age of 21 and enrolled in a special education program, who is living in New Jersey with the child's natural or adoptive parent or legal guardian, or with a relative designated by the commissioner in a place of residence maintained by the relative as the relative's home. "Eligible [alien] noncitizen" means one of the following: a.     a qualified [alien] noncitizen admitted to the United States prior to August 22, 1996, who is eligible for means-tested, federally funded public benefits pursuant to federal law; b.    a refugee, asylee, victim of human trafficking, or person granted withholding of deportation under federal law for the person's first five years after receiving that classification in the United States pursuant to federal law; c.     a qualified [alien] noncitizen who is a veteran of, or on active duty in, the armed forces of the United States, or the spouse or dependent child of that person pursuant to federal law; d.    a recipient of refugee and entrant assistance activities or a Cuban or Haitian entrant pursuant to federal law; e.     a legal permanent resident [alien] noncitizen who has worked 40 qualifying quarters of coverage as defined under Title II of the federal Social Security Act; except that, for any period after December 31, 1996, a quarter during which an individual received means-tested, federally funded public benefits shall not count toward the total number of quarters; f.     a qualified [alien] noncitizen admitted to the United States on or after August 22, 1996, who has lived in the United States for at least five years and is eligible for means-tested, federally funded public benefits pursuant to federal law; or g.    a qualified [alien] noncitizen who has been battered or subjected to extreme cruelty in the United States by a spouse, parent or a member of the spouse or parent's family residing in the same household as the [alien] noncitizen, or a qualified [alien] noncitizen whose child has been battered or subjected to extreme cruelty in the United States by a spouse or parent of the [alien] noncitizen, without the active participation of the [alien] noncitizen, or by a member of the spouse or parent's family residing in the same household as the [alien] noncitizen.  In either case, the spouse or parent shall have consented or acquiesced to the battery or cruelty and there shall be a substantial connection between the battery or cruelty and the need for benefits to be provided.  The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to [an alien] a noncitizen during any period in which the individual responsible for the battery or cruelty resides in the same household or assistance unit as the individual subjected to the battery or cruelty. Benefits shall be provided to the extent and for the period of time that the [alien] noncitizen or [aliens] noncitizens child is eligible for the program. For the purposes of this section, qualified [alien] noncitizen is defined pursuant to the definition of a qualified alien under the provisions of section 431 of Title IV of Pub.L.104-193. "Income" means, but is not limited to, commissions, salaries, self-employed earnings, child support and alimony payments, interest and dividend earnings, wages, receipts, unemployment compensation, any legal or equitable interest or entitlement owed that was acquired by a cause of action, suit, claim or counterclaim, insurance benefits, temporary disability claims, estate income, trusts, federal income tax refunds, State income tax refunds, homestead rebates, lottery prizes, casino and racetrack winnings, annuities, retirement benefits, veterans' benefits, union benefits, or other sources that may be defined as income by the commissioner; except that in the event that individual development accounts for recipients are established by regulation of the commissioner, any interest or dividend earnings from such an account shall not be considered income. "Income eligibility standard" means the income eligibility threshold based on assistance unit size established by regulation of the commissioner for benefits provided within the limit of funds appropriated by the Legislature. "Legal guardian" means a person who exercises continuing control over the person or property, or both, of a child, including any specific right of control over an aspect of the child's upbringing, pursuant to a court order. "Non-needy caretaker" means a relative caring for a dependent child, or a legal guardian of a minor child who, in the absence of a natural or adoptive parent, assumes parental responsibility and has income which exceeds the income eligibility standard but is less than 150% of the State median income adjusted for household size. "Recipient" means a recipient of benefits under the Work First New Jersey program. "Resources" means all real and personal property as defined by the commissioner; except that in the event that individual development accounts for recipients are established by regulation of the commissioner, all funds in such an account, up to the limit determined by the commissioner, including any interest or dividend earnings from such an account, shall not be considered to be a resource. "Services" means any Work First New Jersey benefits that are not provided in the form of cash assistance. "Title IV-D" means the provisions of Title IV-D of the federal Social Security Act governing paternity establishment and child support enforcement activities and requirements. "Work First New Jersey program" or "program" means theprogram established pursuant to P.L.1997, c.38 (C.44:10-55 et seq.). (cf: P.L.2007, c.96, s.3) 17.      Section 2 of P.L.1997, c.14 (C.44:10-45) is amended to read as follows: 2.    a.  Benefits under the Work First New Jersey program shall be determined according to standards of income and resources established by the commissioner.  These standards shall take into account, for the determination of eligibility and the provision of benefits, all income and resources of all persons in the assistance unit of which the applicant or recipient is a member, except as provided by law governing the Work First New Jersey program and as prescribed by the commissioner. The benefits to be granted shall be governed by standards established by regulation of the commissioner.  The commissioner may set income and resource eligibility and benefits standards that differ with respect to types of assistance units. b.    A recipient, as a condition of eligibility for benefits, shall, subject to good cause exceptions as defined by the commissioner, be required to: do all acts stated herein necessary to establish the paternity of a child born out-of-wedlock, and to establish and participate in the enforcement of  child support obligations; cooperate with work requirements established by the commissioner; make application for any other assistance for which members of the assistance unit may be eligible; be income and resource eligible as defined by the commissioner, including the deeming of income and resources as appropriate; provide all necessary documentation which shall include the federal Social Security number for all assistance unit members, except for an eligible [alien] noncitizen who cannot be assigned a Social Security number due to his status, or make application for same; sign an agreement to repay benefits in the event of receipt of income or resources; and  comply with personal identification requirements as a condition  of receiving benefits, which may employ the use of  high technology processes for the detection of fraud. c.     Notwithstanding any other provision of law or regulation to the contrary, an applicant shall not be eligible for benefits when the applicant's eligibility is the result of a voluntary cessation of employment without good cause, as determined by the commissioner, within 90 days prior to the date of application for benefits. d.    A voluntary assignment or transfer of income or resources within one year prior to the time of application for benefits for the purpose of qualifying therefor shall render the applicant and the applicant's assistance unit members ineligible for benefits for a period of time determined by regulation of the commissioner. e.     Any income or resources that are exempted by federal law for purposes of eligibility for benefits shall not reduce the amount of benefits received by a recipient and shall not be subject to a lien or be available for repayment to the State or county agency for benefits received by the individual. (cf: P.L.1997, c.14, s.2 18. Section 5 of P.L.1997, c.14 (C.44:10-48) is amended to read as follows: 5. a. Only those persons who are United States citizens or eligible [aliens] noncitizens shall be eligible for benefits under the Work First New Jersey program. Single adults or couples without dependent children who are legal [aliens] noncitizens who meet federal requirements and have applied for citizenship, shall not receive benefits for more than six months unless (1) they attain citizenship, or (2) they have passed the English language and civics components for citizenship, and are awaiting final determination of citizenship by the federal Immigration and Naturalization Service. b.    The following persons shall not be eligible for assistance and shall not be considered to be members of an assistance unit: (1) non-needy caretakers, except that the eligibility of a dependent child shall not be affected by the income or resources of a non-needy caretaker; (2) Supplemental Security Income recipients, except for the purposes of receiving emergency assistance benefits pursuant to section 8 of P.L.1997, c.14 (C.44:10-51); (3) [illegal aliens] undocumented noncitizens; (4) other [aliens] noncitizens who are not eligible [aliens] noncitizens; (5) a person absent from the home who is incarcerated in a federal, State, county or local corrective facility or under the custody of correctional authorities, except as provided by regulation of the commissioner; (6) a person who: is fleeing to avoid prosecution, custody or confinement after conviction, under the laws of the jurisdiction from which the person has fled, for a crime or an attempt to commit a crime which is a felony or a high misdemeanor under the laws of the jurisdiction from which the person has fled; or is violating a condition of probation or parole imposed under federal or state law; (7) (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2021, c.312). (8) a person found to have fraudulently misrepresented his residence in order to obtain means-tested, public benefits in two or more states or jurisdictions, who shall be ineligible for benefits for a period of 10 years from the date of conviction in a federal or state court; or (9) a person who intentionally makes a false or misleading statement or misrepresents, conceals or withholds facts for the purpose of receiving benefits, who shall be ineligible for benefits for a period of six months for the first violation, 12 months for the second violation, and permanently for the third violation. c.     A person who makes a false statement with the intent to qualify for benefits and by reason thereof receives benefits for which the person is not eligible is guilty of a crime of the fourth degree. d.    Pursuant to the authorization provided to the states under 21 U.S.C. s.862a(d)(1), this State elects to exempt from the application of 21 U.S.C. s.862a(a): (1) needy persons and their dependent children domiciled in New Jersey for the purposes of receiving benefits under the Work First New Jersey program and food assistance under the federal "Food and Nutrition Act of 2008," Pub.L.110-234 (7 U.S.C. s.2011 et seq.); and (2) single persons and married couples without dependent children domiciled in New Jersey for the purposes of receiving food assistance under Pub.L.110-234. (cf: P.L.2021, c.312, s.17) 19. Section 3 of P.L.1997, c.38 (C.44:10-57) is amended to read as follows: 3.    As used in this act: "Alternative work experience" means unpaid work and training  only with a public, private nonprofit or private charitable employer that provides a recipient with the experience necessary to adjust to, and learn how to function in, an employment setting and the opportunity to combine that experience with education and job training.  An alternative work experience participant shall not be assigned to work for a private, for profit employer. "Applicant" means an applicant for benefits provided by the Work First New Jersey program. "Assistance unit" means: a single person without dependent children; a couple without dependent children; dependent children only; or a person or couple with one or more dependent children who are legally or blood-related, or who is their legal guardian, and who live together as a household unit. "Benefits" means any assistance provided to needy persons and their dependent children and needy single persons and couples without dependent children under the Work First New Jersey program. "Case management" means the provision of certain services to Work First New Jersey recipients, which shall include an assessment and development of an individual responsibility plan. "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Human Services. "Community work experience" means unpaid work and training only with a public, private nonprofit or private charitable employer provided to a recipient when, and to the extent, that such experience is necessary to enable the recipient to adjust to, and learn how to function in, an employment setting.  A community work experience participant shall not be assigned to work for a private, for profit employer. "County agency" means the  county agency that was administering the aid to families with dependent children program at the time the federal "Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996," Pub.L.104-193, was enacted and which, upon the enactment of P.L.1997, c.38 (C.44:10-55 et seq.) shall also administer the Work First New Jersey program in that county. "Dependent child" means a child: a.     under the age of 18; b.    under the age of 19 and a full-time student in a secondary school or an equivalent level of vocational or technical training, if, before the student attains age 19, the student may reasonably be expected to complete the student's program of secondary school or training; or c.     under the age of 21 and enrolled in a special education program, who is living in New Jersey with the child's natural or adoptive parent or legal guardian, or with a relative designated by the commissioner in a place of residence maintained by the relative as the relative's home. "Eligible [alien] noncitizen" means one of the following: a.     a qualified [alien] noncitizen admitted to the United States prior to August 22, 1996, who is eligible for means-tested, federally funded public benefits pursuant to federal law; b.    a refugee, asylee, or person granted withholding of deportation under federal law for the person's first five years after receiving that classification in the United States pursuant to federal law; c.     a qualified [alien] noncitizen who is a veteran of, or on active duty in, the armed forces of the United States, or the spouse or dependent child of that person pursuant to federal law; d.    a recipient of refugee and entrant assistance activities or a Cuban or Haitian entrant pursuant to federal law; e.     a legal permanent resident [alien] noncitizen who has worked 40 qualifying quarters of coverage as defined under Title II of the federal Social Security Act; except that, for any period after December 31, 1996, a quarter during which an individual received means-tested, federally funded public benefits shall not count toward the total number of quarters; f.     a qualified [alien] noncitizen admitted to the United States on or after August 22, 1996, who has lived in the United States for at least five years and is eligible for means-tested, federally funded public benefits pursuant to federal law  ; or g.    a qualified [alien] noncitizen who has been battered or subjected to extreme cruelty in the United States by a spouse, parent or a member of the spouse or parent's family residing in the same household as the [alien] noncitizen, or a qualified [alien] noncitizen whose child has been battered or subjected to extreme cruelty in the United States by a spouse or parent of the [alien] noncitizen, without the active participation of the [alien] noncitizen, or by a member of the spouse or parent's family residing in the same household as the [alien] noncitizen.  In either case, the spouse or parent shall have consented or acquiesced to the battery or cruelty and there shall be a substantial connection between the battery or cruelty and the need for benefits to be provided.  The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to [an alien] a noncitizen during any period in which the individual responsible for the battery or cruelty resides in the same household or assistance unit as the individual subjected to the battery or cruelty.  Benefits shall be provided to the extent and for the period of time that the [alien] noncitizen or [aliens] noncitizens child is eligible for the program. For the purposes of this section, "qualified [alien] noncitizen" is defined pursuant to the definition of a qualified alien under the provisions of section 431 of Title IV of Pub.L.104-193. "Full-time post-secondary student" means a student enrolled for a minimum of 12 credit hours in a post-secondary school. "Income" means, but is not limited to, commissions, salaries, self-employed earnings, child support and alimony payments, interest and dividend earnings, wages, receipts, unemployment compensation, any legal or equitable interest or entitlement owed that was acquired by a  cause of action, suit, claim or counterclaim, insurance benefits, temporary disability claims, estate income, trusts, federal income tax refunds, State income tax refunds, homestead rebates, lottery prizes, casino and racetrack winnings, annuities, retirement benefits, veterans' benefits, union benefits, or other sources that may be defined as income by the commissioner; except that in the event that individual development accounts for recipients are established by regulation of the commissioner, any interest or dividend earnings from such an account shall not be considered income. "Legal guardian" means a person who exercises continuing control over the person or property, or both, of a child, including any specific right of control over an aspect of the child's upbringing, pursuant to a court order. "Program" means the Work First New Jersey program established pursuant to this act. "Recipient" means a recipient of benefits under the Work First New Jersey program. "Resources" means all real and personal property as defined by the commissioner; except that in the event that individual development accounts for recipients are established by regulation of the commissioner, all funds in such an account, up to the limit determined by the commissioner, including any interest or dividend earnings from such an account, shall not be considered to be a resource. "Title IV-D" means the provisions of Title IV-D of the federal Social Security Act governing paternity establishment and child support enforcement activities and requirements. "Work activity" includes, but is not limited to, the following, as defined by regulation of the commissioner: employment; on-the-job training; job search and job readiness assistance; vocational educational training;  job skills training related directly to employment; community work experience; alternative work experience; supportive work; community service programs, including the provision of child care as a community service project;  in the case of teenage parents or recipients under the age of 19 who are expected to graduate or complete their course of study by their 19th birthday, satisfactory attendance at a secondary school or in a course of study leading to a certificate of general equivalence; and education that is necessary for employment in the case of a person who has not received a high school diploma or a certificate of high school equivalency, a course of study leading to a certificate of general equivalence, or post-secondary education, when combined with community work experience participation or another work activity approved by the commissioner, including employment. (cf: P.L.1997, c.38, s.3) 20. Section 5 of P.L.1997, c.38 (C.44:10-59) is amended to read as follows: 5.    a.  All adult persons, except as otherwise provided by law governing the Work First New Jersey program, are charged with the primary responsibility of supporting and maintaining themselves and their dependents; the primary responsibility for the support and maintenance of minor children is that of the parents and family of those children; and benefits shall be provided only when other means of support and maintenance are not present to support the assistance unit. b.    Benefits shall be temporary and serve the primary goal of fostering self-sufficiency.  Failure to cooperate with any of the program eligibility requirements without good cause, as determined by the commissioner, shall result in ineligibility for benefits for some or all assistance unit members. c.     If the county agency or municipal welfare agency, as appropriate, determines, based upon an applicant's written statement signed under oath, that the applicant is in immediate need of benefits because the applicant's available resources are insufficient , as determined by the commissioner, to meet the minimal current living expenses pursuant to regulations adopted by the commissioner, of the applicant's assistance unit, the county agency or municipal welfare agency shall issue cash assistance benefits to the applicant on the date of application, subject to the applicant meeting all other program eligibility requirements. d.    The commissioner shall establish by regulation, standards and procedures to screen and identify recipients with a history of being subjected to domestic violence and refer these recipients to counseling and supportive services.  The commissioner may waive program requirements, including, but not limited to, the  time limit on benefits pursuant to section 2 of  P.L.1997, c.37 (C.44:10-72), residency requirements pursuant to section 6 of P.L.1997, c.38 (C.44:10-60), child support cooperation requirements pursuant to subsection b. of section 2 of P.L.1997, c.14 (C.44:10-45) and the limitation on increase of cash assistance benefits as a result of the birth of a child pursuant to section 7 of P.L.1997, c.38 (C.44:10-61), in cases where compliance with such requirements would make it more difficult for a recipient to escape domestic violence or unfairly penalize the recipient who is or has been victimized by such violence, or who is at risk of further domestic violence. e.     The commissioner shall establish regulations determining eligibility and other requirements of the Work First New Jersey program.  Regulations shall include provisions for the deeming of income, when appropriate, which include situations involving the sponsor of an eligible [alien] noncitizen in accordance with federal law, and legally responsible relatives of assistance unit members. (cf: P.L.1997, c.38, s.5) 21.  R.S.46:3-18 is amended to read as follows: 46:3-18.      [Alien] Noncitizen friends shall have the same rights, powers and privileges and be subject to the same burdens, duties, liabilities and restrictions in respect of  real estate situate in this State as native-born citizens.  Any [alien] noncitizen who shall be domiciled and resident in the United States and licensed or permitted by the government of the United States to remain in and engage in business transactions in the United States, and who shall not be arrested or interned or his property taken by the United States, shall be considered [an alien] a noncitizen friend within the meaning of this act. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to: a.     Entitle any [alien] noncitizen to be elected into any office of trust or profit in this State, or to vote at any town meeting or election of members of the Senate and General Assembly, or other officers, within this State, or for Representatives in Congress or electors of the President and Vice-President of the United States; or b.    Prevent the sequestration, seizure or disposal by either the State or National government of any real estate or interest therein so long as the same is owned or held by any [alien] noncitizen, made pursuant to duly enacted legislation, during the continuance of war between the United States and the government of the country of which any such [alien] noncitizen is a citizen or subject; but any bona fide conveyance, mortgage or devise made by such [alien] noncitizen shall be valid, if made to a citizen of the United States or to [an alien] a noncitizen friend. (cf: P.L.1943, c.145, s.1) 22.  Section 44 of P.L.1961, c.32 (C.54:8A-44) is amended to read as follows: 44.  (a)  On or before the filing date prescribed in section 18 (C.54:8A-18) of this act, an income tax return shall be made and filed by or for every individual having a gross income derived from sources within his source state in excess of the sum of his personal exemptions allowed in section 10 (C.54:8A-10) of this act, or having any items of tax preference derived from or connected with New Jersey sources in excess of the specific deduction provided in section 6.2(c) (C.54:8A-6.2(c)). (b)   (1)  If the Federal income tax liability of husband or wife is determined on a separate Federal return, their New Jersey income tax liabilities and returns shall be separate. (2)   If the Federal income tax liabilities of husband and wife (other than a husband and wife described in paragraph (3)) are determined on a joint Federal return, or if neither files a Federal return: (A)  They shall file a joint New Jersey income tax return, and their tax liabilities shall be joint and several, or (B)  They may elect to file separate New Jersey income tax returns on a single form if they comply with the requirements of the Division of Taxation in setting forth information, and in such event their tax liabilities shall be separate. (3)   If either husband or wife is a resident and the other is a nonresident,  they shall file separate New Jersey income tax returns on such single or  separate forms as may be required by the Division of Taxation, and in such  event their tax liabilities shall be separate. (4)   Marital or other status.  An individual's marital or other status under  subsection 2(c) (C.54:8A-2(c)), subsection 9(b) of P.L.1961, c.32 (C.54:8A-9(b)) and subsection 7(a)(3)(B) of this amendatory and supplementary act shall be presumed to be the same as his marital or other status for purposes of  establishing the applicable Federal income tax rates.  However, an individual  who is a nonresident noncitizen, defined federally as a nonresident alien , for Federal income tax purposes and who fails to  qualify under subsection 2(c), or subsection 9(b) of P.L.1961, c.32 or  subsection 7(a)(3)(B) of this amendatory and supplementary act solely by reason  of his status for purposes of establishing the applicable Federal income tax  rates shall, nevertheless, qualify under such provisions provided he files a  statement with his return setting forth such information in respect to his  status as the director shall prescribe. (c)   The return for any deceased individual shall be made and filed by his fiduciary or other person charged with his property. (d)   The return for an individual who is unable to make a return by reason of  minority or other disability shall be made and filed by his fiduciary or other  person charged with the care of his person or property (other than a receiver  in possession of only a part of his property), or by his duly authorized  agent. (e)   Any tax under this act, and any increase, interest or penalty thereon, shall, from the time it is due and payable, be a personal debt of the person liable to pay the same, to the State of New Jersey. (f)   If the amount of net income or Federal items of tax preference for any year of any taxpayer as returned to the United States Treasury Department or to  an appropriate State officer is changed or corrected by the taxpayer or the  Commissioner of Internal Revenue or other officer of the United States or other  competent authority, or where a renegotiation of a contract or subcontract with  the United States results in a change in net income, or Federal items of tax preference such taxpayer shall report such change or corrected net income, or Federal items of tax preference or the results of such renegotiation, within 90  days after the final determination of such change or correction or renegotiation, or as required by regulation, and shall concede the accuracy of such determination or state wherein it is erroneous.  Any taxpayer filing an amended return with such department or officer shall also file within 90 days thereafter an amended return in this State which shall contain such information as the regulations shall require. (cf: P.L.1978, c.131, s.5) 23. N.J.S.54A:2-1 is amended to read as follows: 54A:2-1.  Imposition of tax. There is hereby imposed a tax for each taxable year (which shall be the same as the taxable year for federal income tax purposes) on the New Jersey gross income as herein defined of every individual, estate or trust (other than a charitable trust or a trust forming part of a pension or profit-sharing plan), subject to the deductions, limitations and modifications hereinafter provided, determined in accordance with the following tables with respect to taxpayers' taxable income: a.     For married individuals filing a joint return and individuals filing as head of household or as surviving spouse for federal income tax purposes: (1)   for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1991 but before January 1, 1994: If the taxable income is:          The tax is: Not over $20,000.00..........    2% of taxable income Over $20,000.00 but not over $50,000.00........$400.00 plus 2.5% of the excess over $20,000.00 Over $50,000.00 but not over $70,000.00........             $1,150.00 plus 3.5% of the excess over $50,000.00 Over $70,000.00 but not over $80,000.00........              $1,850.00 plus 5.0% of the excess over $70,000.00 Over $80,000.00 but not over $150,000.00......              $2,350.00 plus 6.5% of the excess over $80,000.00 Over $150,000.00 ............     $6,900.00 plus 7.0% of the excess over $150,000.00 (2)        For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1994 but before January 1, 1995: If the taxable income is: The tax is: Not over $20,000.00......                    1.900% of taxable income Over $20,000.00 but not over $50,000.00.......              $380.00 plus 2.375% of the excess over $20,000.00 Over $50,000.00 but not over $70,000.00......                $1,092.50 plus 3.325% of the excess over $50,000.00 Over $70,000.00 but not over $80,000.00.......              $1,757.50 plus 4.750% of the excess over $70,000.00 Over $80,000.00 but not over $150,000.00.......            $2,232.50 plus 6.175% of the excess over $80,000.00 Over $150,000.00 ..........                   $6,555.00 plus 6.650% of the excess over $150,000.00 (3)        for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1995 but before January 1, 1996: If the taxable income is:                   The tax is: Not over $20,000.00..........    1.700% of taxable income Over $20,000.00 but not over $50,000.00........             $340.00 plus 2.125% of the excess over $20,000.00 Over $50,000.00 but not over $70,000.00........             $977.50 plus 2.975% of the excess over $50,000.00 Over $70,000.00 but not over $80,000.00........             $1,572.50 plus 4.250% of the excess over $70,000.00 Over $80,000.00 but not over $150,000.00......             $1,997.50 plus 6.013% of the excess over $80,000.00 Over $150,000.00 ............     $6,206.60 plus 6.580% of the excess over $150,000.00 (4)        for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1996 but before January 1, 2004: If the taxable income is:                   The tax is: Not over $20,000.00............  1.400% of taxable income Over $20,000.00 but not over $50,000.00.........            $280.00 plus 1.750% of the excess over $20,000.00 Over $50,000.00 but not over $70,000.00........             $805.00 plus 2.450% of the excess over $50,000.00 Over $70,000.00 but not over $80,000.00........             $1,295.50 plus 3.500% of the           excess over $70,000.00 Over $80,000.00 but not over $150,000.00......             $1,645.00 plus 5.525% of the           excess over $80,000.00 Over $150,000.00 ...............  $5,512.50 plus 6.370% of the excess over $150,000.00 (5)        for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2004 but before January 1, 2018: If the taxable income is:                   The tax is: Not over $20,000.00..........    1.400% of taxable income Over $20,000.00 but not over $50,000.00........             $280.00 plus 1.750% of the  excess over $20,000.00 Over $50,000.00 but not over $70,000.00........             $805.00 plus 2.450% of the  excess over $50,000.00 Over $70,000.00 but not over $80,000.00.......            $1,295.50 plus 3.500% of the           excess over $70,000.00 Over $80,000.00 but not over $150,000.00......             $1,645.00 plus 5.525% of the excess over $80,000.00 Over $150,000.00 but not over $500,000.00......           $5,512.50 plus 6.370% of the           excess over $150,000.00 Over $500,000.00 ............     $27,807.50 plus 8.970% of the excess over $500,000.00 (6)        for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2018, but before January 1, 2020: If the taxable income is:                   The tax is: Not over $20,000.00..........    1.400% of taxable income Over $20,000.00 but not over $50,000.00......             $280.00 plus 1.750% of the  excess over $20,000.00 Over $50,000.00 but not over $70,000.00.......            $805.00 plus 2.450% of the  excess over $50,000.00 Over $70,000.00 but not over $80,000.00.......            $1,295.50 plus 3.500% of the           excess over $70,000.00 Over $80,000.00 but not over $150,000.00.....            $1,645.00 plus 5.525% of the           excess over $80,000.00 Over $150,000.00 but not over $500,000.00.....            $5,512.50 plus 6.370% of the           excess over $150,000.00 Over $500,000.00 but not over $5,000,000.00..             $27,807.50 plus 8.970% of the         excess over $500,000.00 Over $5,000,000.00 ..........    $431,457.50 plus 10.75% of the excess over $5,000,000.00 (7)        for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2020: If the taxable income is:                    The tax is: Not over $20,000.00........     1.400% of taxable income Over $20,000.00 but not over $50,000.00....                 $280.00 plus 1.750% of the excess over $20,000.00 Over $50,000.00 but not over $70,000.00....                             $805.00 plus 2.450% of the excess over $50,000.00 Over $70,000.00 but not over $80,000.00...                              $1,295.50 plus 3.500% of the excess over $70,000.00 Over $80,000.00 but not over $150,000.00..                             $1,645.00 plus 5.525% of the excess over $80,000.00 Over $150,000.00 but not over $500,000.00..                             $5,512.50 plus 6.370% of the excess over $150,000.00 Over $500,000.00 but not over $1,000,000.00..                          $27,807.50 plus 8.970% of the excess over $500,000.00 Over $1,000,000.00...                                     $72,657.50 plus 10.750% of the excess over $1,000,000.00 b.    For married individuals filing separately, unmarried individuals other than individuals filing as head of household or as a surviving spouse for federal income tax purposes, and estates and trusts: (1)   for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1991 but before January 1, 1994: If the taxable income is:                   The tax is: Not over $20,000.00..........    2% of taxable income Over $20,000.00 but not over $35,000.00.......            $400.00 plus 2.5% of the excess over $20,000.00 Over $35,000.00 but not over $40,000.00.......            $775.00 plus 5.0% of the excess over $35,000.00 Over $40,000.00 but not over $75,000.00.......            $1,025.00 plus 6.5% of the   excess over $40,000.00 Over $75,000.00 ...........               $3,300.00 plus 7.0% of the excess over $75,000.00 (2)        for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1994 but before January 1, 1995: If the taxable income is:                   The tax is: Not over $20,000.00..........    1.900% of taxable income Over $20,000.00 but not over $35,000.00........           $380.00 plus 2.375% of the excess over $20,000.00 Over $35,000.00 but not over $40,000.00........           $736.25 plus 4.750% of the  excess over $35,000.00 Over $40,000.00 but not over $75,000.00........           $973.75 plus 6.175% of the  excess over $40,000.00 Over $75,000.00 ..........                     $3,135.00 plus 6.650% of the           excess over $75,000.00 (3)   for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1995 but before January 1, 1996: If the taxable income is:              The tax is: Not over $20,000.00..........    1.700% of taxable income Over $20,000.00 but not over $35,000.00.......             $340.00 plus 2.125% of the  excess over $20,000.00 Over $35,000.00 but not over $40,000.00..........            $658.75 plus 4.250% of the  excess over $35,000.00 Over $40,000.00 but not over $75,000.00.......            $871.25 plus 6.013% of the  excess over $40,000.00 Over $75,000.00 ..........                     $2,975.80 plus 6.580% of the           excess over $75,000.00 (4)        for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1996 but before January 1, 2004: If the taxable income is:              The tax is: Not over $20,000.00..........    1.400% of taxable income Over $20,000.00 but not over $35,000.00........             $280.00 plus 1.750% of the  excess over $20,000.00 Over $35,000.00 but not over $40,000.00........             $542.50 plus 3.500% of the  excess over $35,000.00 Over $40,000.00 but not over $75,000.00........             $717.50 plus 5.525% of the  excess over $40,000.00 Over $75,000.00............                     $2,651.25 plus 6.370% of the           excess over $75,000.00 (5)        for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2004 but before January 1, 2018: If the taxable income is:                    The tax is: Not over $20,000.00..........    1.400% of taxable income Over $20,000.00 but not over $35,000.00........           $280.00 plus 1.750% of the  excess over $20,000.00 Over $35,000.00 but not over $40,000.00........           $542.50 plus 3.500% of the  excess over $35,000.00 Over $40,000.00 but not over $75,000.00.......            $717.50 plus 5.525% of the  excess over $40,000.00 Over $75,000.00 but not over $500,000.00......           $2,651.25 plus 6.370% of the           excess over $75,000.00 Over $500,000.00 ............     $29,723.75 plus 8.970% of the excess over $500,000.00 (6)        for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2018, but before January 1, 2020: If the taxable income is:                   The tax is: Not over $20,000.00..........    1.400% of taxable income Over $20,000.00 but not over $35,000.00........             $280.00 plus 1.750% of the  excess over $20,000.00 Over $35,000.00 but not over $40,000.00........             $542.50 plus 3.500% of the  excess over $35,000.00 Over $40,000.00 but not over $75,000.00........             $717.50 plus 5.525% of the  excess over $40,000.00 Over $75,000.00 but not over $500,000.00......             $2,651.25 plus 6.370% of the           excess over $75,000.00 Over $500,000.00 but not over $5,000,000.00...             $29,723.75 plus 8.970% of the         excess over $500,000.00 Over $5,000,000.00 ..........    $433,373.75 plus 10.75% of the excess over $5,000,000.00 (7) for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2020: If the taxable income is:                                The tax is: Not over $20,000.00......                   1.400% of taxable income Over $20,000.00 but not over $35,000.00.......                         $280.00 plus 1.750% of the excess over $20,000.00 Over $35,000.00 but not over $40,000.00......                          $542.50 plus 3.500% of the excess over $35,000.00 Over $40,000.00 but not over $75,000.00......                          $717.50 plus 5.525% of the excess over $40,000.00 Over $75,000.00 but not over $500,000.00...                $2,651.25 plus 6.370% of the excess over $75,000.00 Over $500,000.00 but not over $1,000,000.00..                           $29,723.75 plus 8.970% of the excess over $500,000.00 Over $1,000,000.00....                                    $74,573.75 plus 10.750% of the excess over $1,000,000.00 c.     For the purposes of this section, an individual who would be eligible to file as a head of household for federal income tax purposes but for the fact that such taxpayer is a nonresident [alien] noncitizen, defined federally as a nonresident alien, shall determine tax pursuant to subsection a. of this section. d.    For the purposes of this section, for taxable year 2018, withholding by every employer from salaries, wages and other remuneration paid by an employer for services rendered described in subsections a. and b. of this section, in excess of $5,000,000 during that taxable year, shall be at the rate of 15.6% as soon as practicable but no later than September 1, 2018. The Director of the Division of Taxation is authorized to do all things necessary to implement the withholding tax prescribed by this section for taxable year 2018. e.     No additions to tax or penalty shall be imposed under N.J.S.54A:9-6 for insufficient payment of estimated tax that may otherwise be due on salaries, wages and other remuneration received before September 1, 2018, on which there is a rate of tax imposed pursuant to subsections a. and b. of this section. f.     An employer maintaining an office or transacting business within this State and making payment of any salaries, wages and remuneration subject to New Jersey gross income tax or making payment of any remuneration for employment subject to contribution under the New Jersey "unemployment compensation law," pursuant to R.S.43:21-1 et seq., that is subject to New Jersey gross income tax shall not be subject to interest, penalties or other costs that may otherwise be imposed for insufficient withholding of salaries, wages and other remuneration made before September 1, 2018, that is directly attributable to the enactment of the taxable income tables and tax rates in subsections a. and b. of this section. (cf: P.L.2020, c.94, s.1) 24. (New section)  a.  An executive agency of the State of New Jersey shall not use the following terms in any proposed or final rule, regulation, interpretation, publication, other document, display, or sign issued by the agency after the date of the enactment of this act, P.L.    , c.    (C.    ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), except to the extent that the term is used in quoting or reproducing text written by a source other than an officer or employee of the agency: (1)   The term alien, when used to refer to an individual who is not a citizen or national of the United States. (2)   The term illegal alien when used to refer to an individual who is unlawfully present in the United States or who lacks a lawful immigration status in the United States. b.    Nothing in this act shall be construed as intended to result in a reduction of federal funds that may be available to the State. c.     Nothing in this act shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the current or future protections, funding, eligibility, services, rights, or responsibilities of any person under any provision or program, benefit, or service whose terminology is revised pursuant to this act. No change in terminology made pursuant to this act shall be construed as causing or intending any change in any definitions or meanings of any provision so changed. d.    Whenever the terms alien or illegal alien occur or any reference is made thereto in any law, regulation, contract, or document, the same shall be deemed to mean or refer to noncitizen and undocumented noncitizen, respectively. 25. This act shall take effect immediately.